Rhode Island statutes. Title 20 Fish and Wildlife
Chapter 17 Artificial Propagation of Game

20-17-1.
Propagation and raising of game birds and animals.

Any person holding a game propagation permit may engage in the rearing within an enclosure of any wild birds, game quadrupeds, or domestic game, to be disposed of for purposes of propagation under any rules and regulations as shall be made, from time to time, by the director, or, in the case of domestic game, for liberation at field trials or upon game preserves. Artificially propagated domestic game shall be tagged for identification with tags or seals supplied, at cost, to the permittee by the department, before being disposed of by the permittee. Game so tagged may be had in possession, transported, bought, and sold at any season of the year.

History of Section.

P.L. 1981, ch. 197, § 3.

20-17-2.
Sale of artificially propagated game.

No person shall engage in the commercial raising or selling of wild birds, game quadrupeds, or domestic game birds unless that person possesses a commercial game propagation license issued by the department.

Game raised under the license may be bought, sold, and had in possession, live, at any season of the year for purposes of propagation.

Carcasses of artificially propagated game may be sold only by a person who holds, in addition to a commercial propagation license, a license issued by the department authorizing the sale of game carcasses. All game carcasses sold under the license must have attached to the game carcass a tag or seal provided to the licensee by the department, at cost, which tag or seal shall remain intact until the game is used.

The director may, from time to time, issue any rules and regulations that he or she deems necessary to control the operation of the business of propagation, raising, and sale of game.

History of Section.

P.L. 1981, ch. 197, § 3.

20-17-3.
Records of game sales.

All persons selling artificially propagated or reared game and domestic game birds shall keep accurate records of the sales that shall be available for inspection by agents of the department upon request.

History of Section.

P.L. 1981, ch. 197, § 3.

20-17-4.
Counterfeiting or misuse of tags or seals.

No person shall counterfeit any tag or seal issued by the department in accordance with the provisions of this chapter, and no tag or seal issued shall be affixed to the carcass of any game other than domestic game.

History of Section.

P.L. 1981, ch. 197, § 3.

20-17-5.
Labeling of domestic game birds and animals for shipment by common carrier.

Common carriers may receive and transport at any time carcasses of domestic game birds and animals tagged as provided in §§

20-17-1

and

20-17-2

, but to every package containing the carcasses shall be affixed a tag or label upon which shall be plainly printed or written the name, address, and number of the license of the person to whom the license was issued; the name or names of the person or persons to whom the package is to be transported; the number and kind of carcasses contained in the package; and the signed statement that the package contains domestic game.

History of Section.

P.L. 1981, ch. 197, § 3; P.L. 1989, ch. 542, § 34.

20-17-6.
Retail sale of game birds and animals.

Any keeper of a hotel, a restaurant, a boarding house, and club or a retail dealer in meat may sell domestic game birds and animals, properly tagged or sealed as provided in §§

20-17-1

and

20-17-2

, to a patron or customer for actual consumption and no license for the sale shall be required of the person, keeper, dealer, or club.

History of Section.

P.L. 1981, ch. 197, § 3; P.L. 1989, ch. 542, § 34.

20-17-7.
License for importation of frozen game birds and animals.

No person, firm, corporation, or agent thereof shall import any frozen game from outside the state without having first obtained a license to do so from the director and the proper number of tags for each carcass to be imported and sold; provided, that any frozen game taken under a nonresident license in another state, and so identified with the hunter’s name, address, state in which taken, and nonresident license number may be imported into Rhode Island without additional permits.

History of Section.

P.L. 1981, ch. 197, § 3.

20-17-8.
Revocation of license.

Any license or permit granted by the director, as provided in this chapter, may be by him or her revoked, for cause, at any time, and if any person to whom the license or permit has been issued shall be convicted of a violation of the conservation law in relation to fish and game, the director may not only revoke the license or permit of that person but thereafter no similar license or permit shall be issued to that person for a period of three (3) years.

History of Section.

P.L. 1981, ch. 197, § 3.

20-17-9.
Importation of live fish and game.

The director may, by regulation, prohibit or otherwise regulate the importation of any live fish, birds, or animals from any other state, or from a foreign country, that is not regulated by the department of health under chapter 18 of title 4.

History of Section.

P.L. 1981, ch. 197, § 3.

20-17-10.
Possession by dealers or restaurants of wildlife not authorized for sale.

No person, firm, corporation, or association dealing in poultry, meats, fish, groceries, or other provision, or any other business that requires, or has, an ice box or cold storage or freezing vault, of any description, for use in connection with his or her, their or its business, and no hotel, club, public house, restaurant, or victualer’s house shall purchase or possess any bird or animal, the sale of which is prohibited, without first obtaining a permit from the director.

History of Section.

P.L. 1981, ch. 197, § 3.

20-17-11.
Forfeiture of unlawfully possessed animals.

All wild birds and wild animals seized under the provision of this title, that were taken, possessed, or kept in violation of the law, shall be forfeited to the state in the manner provided by law, and disposed of by the director at his or her discretion.

History of Section.

P.L. 1981, ch. 197, § 3.